Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.360

Order of revocation, suspension.

Any order revoking or suspending a license may, within the discretion of the director, be made conditional upon the settlement, adjustment or satisfaction of the consequence of the violation or violations as specified, and the operation of such an order may be deferred for such purpose. Any such order may contain provisions for modification or dismissal thereof upon presentation to the director of evidence that the matter of complaint has been settled, adjusted or withdrawn at any time before such order becomes final.

[ 1959 c 139 s 36.]